Tennessee, session 114, HB2492.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 67, Chapter 1, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) The department of finance and administration shall promulgate rules
governing cash transaction rounding. Such rules must:
(1) Require rounding to the nearest five cents ($0.05), through the
establishment of specific rounding methodology;
(2) Create specific standards to prohibit rounding practices that
systematically favor the seller; and
(3) Require receipts to clearly itemize:
(A) Transaction subtotals;
(B) Any rounding adjustments; and
(C) The total price for transactions.
(b) The rules promulgated under subsection (a) must be in accordance with the
Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.
(c) The department of finance and administration shall enforce the requirements
of this section and rules promulgated in accordance with this section through the use of
existing funds, personnel, and other such resources.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 47-18-104(b), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
HB2492
012674
- 1 -

Failure to comply with a cash transaction rounding rule promulgated under
Section 1 of this act.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 012674